Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6676XS (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 2196 Section 1. Section 507B.4, subsection 3, paragraph j, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (16) Failing to wait at least seventy-two 3 hours before settling or attempting to settle a motor vehicle 4 claim as required in section 507B.10. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 507B.10 Waiting period before settling 6 motor vehicle claims. 7 1. An insurer shall not settle or attempt to settle a motor 8 vehicle claim during the first seventy-two hours after the 9 occurrence of the event giving rise to the claim. 10 2. An insurerâs duty to promptly settle a claim is tolled 11 during the mandatory waiting period described in subsection 1. 12